Hawaii statutes.
[§161-27] Inspectors. Veterinarians
and poultry inspectors shall examine and inspect all poultry, all carcasses and
parts thereof, and all poultry products, and the sanitary conditions of all
establishments in which poultry or poultry products are processed; and the
veterinarians and poultry inspectors shall refuse to stamp, mark, tag, or label
any carcass or any part thereof, or poultry product, prepared in any
establishment until it shall have actually been inspected and found to be not
adulterated; and shall perform such other duties as are provided by this
chapter and by the rules and regulations to be prescribed by the board and the
board shall, from time to time, make such rules and regulations in accordance
with chapter 91, as are necessary for the efficient execution of this chapter,
and all inspections and examinations made under this chapter shall be in
accordance with the rules and regulations prescribed by the board and this
chapter. [L 1969, c 212, §19]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next